North Carolina statutes. Chapter 157. Housing Authorities and Projects.
Article 1. Housing Authorities Law.
§ 157-8.
Removal of commissioners.

The mayor may remove a commissioner for inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, but only after the commissioner shall have been given a copy of the charges against him (which may be made by the mayor) at least 10 days prior to the hearing thereon and had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

Any obligee of the authority may file with the mayor written charges that the authority is violating willfully any law of the State or any term, provision or covenant in any contract to which the authority is a party. The mayor shall give each of the commissioners a copy of such charges at least 10 days prior to the hearing thereon and an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel and shall within 15 days after receipt of such charges remove any commissioners of the authority who shall have been found to have acquiesced in any such willful violation.

A commissioner shall be deemed to have acquiesced in a willful violation by the authority of a law of this State or of any term, provision or covenant contained in a contract to which the authority is a party, if, before a hearing is held on the charges against him, he shall not have filed a written statement with the authority of his objections to, or lack of participation in, such violation.

In the event of the removal of any commissioner, the mayor shall file in the office of the city clerk a record of the proceedings together with the charges made against the commissioners and the findings thereon.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 8.

Local Modification.

City of Durham: 1971, c. 575.

§ 157-9.
Powers of authority.

An authority shall constitute a public body and a body corporate and politic, exercising public powers, and having all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this Article, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted:To investigate into living, dwelling and housing conditions and into the means and methods of improving such conditions; to determine where unsafe, or insanitary dwelling or housing conditions exist; to study and make recommendations concerning the plan of any city or municipality located within its boundaries in relation to the problem of clearing, replanning and reconstruction of areas in which unsafe or insanitary dwelling or housing conditions exist, and the providing of dwelling accommodations for persons of low income, and to cooperate with any city municipal or regional planning agency; to prepare, carry out and operate housing projects; to approve, assist, and cooperate with, as its instrumentality, a nonprofit corporation in providing financing by the issuance by such nonprofit corporation’s obligations (which obligations shall not be or be deemed to be indebtedness of a housing authority) for one or more housing projects, pursuant to the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended, and applicable regulations thereunder, specifically including, but not limited to, programs to make construction and other loans to developers or owners of residential housing, and to acquire, operate or manage such a housing project, and to administer federal housing assistance subsidy payments for such projects; to provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration or repair of any housing project or any part thereof; to take over by purchase, lease or otherwise any housing project located within its boundaries undertaken by any government, or by any city or municipality located in whole or in part within its boundaries; to manage as agent of any city or municipality located in whole or in part within its boundaries any housing project constructed or owned by such city; to act as agent for the federal government in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation and/or management of a housing project or any part thereof; to arrange with any city or municipality located in whole or in part within its boundaries or with a government for the furnishing, planning, replanning, installing, opening or closing of streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks or other places or facilities or for the acquisition by such city, municipality, or government of property, options or property rights or for the furnishing of property or services in connection with a project; to arrange with the State, its subdivisions and agencies, and any county, city or municipality of the State, to the extent that it is within the scope of each of their respective functions, (i) to cause the services customarily provided by each of them to be rendered for the benefit of such housing authority and/or the occupants of any housing projects and (ii) to provide and maintain parks and sewage, water and other facilities adjacent to or in connection with housing projects and (iii) to change the city or municipality map, to plan, replan, zone or rezone any part of the city or municipality; to lease or rent any of the dwelling or other accommodations or any of the lands, buildings, structures or facilities embraced in any housing project and to establish and revise the rents or charges therefor; to enter upon any building or property in order to conduct investigations or to make surveys or soundings; to purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant, devise, or otherwise any property real or personal or any interest therein from any person, firm, corporation, city, municipality, or government; to acquire by eminent domain any real property, including improvements and fixtures thereon; to sell, exchange, transfer, assign, or pledge any property real or personal or any interest therein to any person, firm, corporation, municipality, city, or government; to own, hold, clear and improve property; to insure or provide for the insurance of the property or operations of the authority against such risks as the authority may deem advisable; to procure insurance or guarantees from a federal government of the payment of any debts or parts thereof secured by mortgages made or held by the authority on any property included in any housing project; to borrow money upon its bonds, notes, debentures or other evidences of indebtedness and to secure the same by pledges of its revenues, and by mortgages upon property held or to be held by it, or in any other manner; in connection with any loan, to agree to limitations upon its right to dispose of any housing project or part thereof or to undertake additional housing projects; in connection with any loan by a government, to agree to limitations upon the exercise of any powers conferred upon the authority by this Article; to invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds, or any funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; to sue and be sued; to have a seal and to alter the same at pleasure; to have perpetual succession; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority; to make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations not inconsistent with this Article, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority; to conduct examinations and investigations and to hear testimony and take proof under oath at public or private hearings on any matter material for its information; to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses or the production of books and papers and to issue commissions for the examination of witnesses who are out of the State or unable to attend before the authority, or excused from attendance; and to make available to such agencies, boards or commissions as are charged with the duty of abating or requiring the correction of nuisances or like conditions, or of demolishing unsafe or insanitary structures within its territorial limits, its findings and recommendations with regard to any building or property where conditions exist which are dangerous to the public health, morals, safety or welfare. Any of the investigations or examinations provided for in this Article may be conducted by the authority or by a committee appointed by it, consisting of one or more commissioners, or by counsel, or by an officer or employee specially authorized by the authority to conduct it. Any commissioner, counsel for the authority, or any person designated by it to conduct an investigation or examination shall have power to administer oaths, take affidavits and issue subpoenas or commissions. An authority may exercise any or all of the powers herein conferred upon it, either generally or with respect to any specific housing project or projects, through or by an agent or agents which it may designate, including any corporation or corporations which are or shall be formed under the laws of this State, and for such purposes an authority may cause one or more corporations to be formed under the laws of this State or may acquire the capital stock of any corporation or corporations. Any corporate agent, (i) all of the stock of which shall be owned by the authority or its nominee or nominees or (ii) the board of directors of which shall be elected or appointed by the authority or is composed of the commissioners of the authority or (iii) which is otherwise subject to the control of the authority or the governmental entity which created the authority, may to the extent permitted by law exercise any of the powers conferred upon the authority herein. In addition to all of the other powers herein conferred upon it, an authority may do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this Article. No provisions with respect to the acquisition, operation or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to an authority unless the legislature shall specifically so state.

the insurance of the property or operations of the authority against such risks as the authority may deem advisable; to procure insurance or guarantees from a federal government of the payment of any debts or parts thereof secured by mortgages made or held by the authority on any property included in any housing project; to borrow money upon its bonds, notes, debentures or other evidences of indebtedness and to secure the same by pledges of its revenues, and by mortgages upon property held or to be held by it, or in any other manner; in connection with any loan, to agree to limitations upon its right to dispose of any housing project or part thereof or to undertake additional housing projects; in connection with any loan by a government, to agree to limitations upon the exercise of any powers conferred upon the authority by this Article; to invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds, or any funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; to sue and be sued; to have a seal and to alter the same at pleasure; to have perpetual succession; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority; to make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations not inconsistent with this Article, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority; to conduct examinations and investigations and to hear testimony and take proof under oath at public or private hearings on any matter material for its information; to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses or the production of books and papers and to issue commissions for the examination of witnesses who are out of the State or unable to attend before the authority, or excused from attendance; and to make available to such agencies, boards or commissions as are charged with the duty of abating or requiring the correction of nuisances or like conditions, or of demolishing unsafe or insanitary structures within its territorial limits, its findings and recommendations with regard to any building or property where conditions exist which are dangerous to the public health, morals, safety or welfare. Any of the investigations or examinations provided for in this Article may be conducted by the authority or by a committee appointed by it, consisting of one or more commissioners, or by counsel, or by an officer or employee specially authorized by the authority to conduct it. Any commissioner, counsel for the authority, or any person designated by it to conduct an investigation or examination shall have power to administer oaths, take affidavits and issue subpoenas or commissions. An authority may exercise any or all of the powers herein conferred upon it, either generally or with respect to any specific housing project or projects, through or by an agent or agents which it may designate, including any corporation or corporations which are or shall be formed under the laws of this State, and for such purposes an authority may cause one or more corporations to be formed under the laws of this State or may acquire the capital stock of any corporation or corporations. Any corporate agent, (i) all of the stock of which shall be owned by the authority or its nominee or nominees or (ii) the board of directors of which shall be elected or appointed by the authority or is composed of the commissioners of the authority or (iii) which is otherwise subject to the control of the authority or the governmental entity which created the authority, may to the extent permitted by law exercise any of the powers conferred upon the authority herein. In addition to all of the other powers herein conferred upon it, an authority may do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this Article. No provisions with respect to the acquisition, operation or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to an authority unless the legislature shall specifically so state.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Article or in any other provision of law an authority may include in any contract let in connection with a project, stipulations requiring that the contractor and any subcontractors comply with requirements as to minimum wages and maximum hours of labor, and comply with any conditions which the federal government may have attached to its financial aid of the project.

To the extent not inconsistent with the Constitution or statutes of this State or the United States, an authority may adopt and enforce rules governing the lawful entry of guests and visitors to its properties, including the visitors and guests of its tenants. Prior to adopting such rules, an authority shall make reasonable efforts to consult with or obtain comments from its tenants or their representatives. Persons who enter or remain on the property of an authority in violation of such rules shall be subject to prosecution as applicable under

G.S. 14-159.12

or

G.S. 14-159.13

.

A housing authority shall not erect or maintain around any lawfully occupied housing units any fence or gate structure that is electrified or that includes spikes or barbed wire.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 9; 1939, c. 150; 1977, c. 784, s. 1; 1979, c. 690, s. 1; c. 805; 1995, c. 520, s. 2; 2004-199, s. 40; 2011-284, s. 109.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-199, s. 40, effective August 17, 2004, added subsection (d).

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 109, effective June 24, 2011, deleted “bequest” following “acquire by gift, grant” near the middle of the last paragraph in subsection (a).

§ 157-9.1.
Moderate income.

Whenever the words “low income” appear in this Chapter, they shall be construed to mean “low and moderate income.”

This section applies only to the housing authority of the largest city in a county which has two or more cities with a population of 60,000 or over, according to the most recent decennial federal census.

This section shall apply only to existing, non-federally subsidized structures.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (b) and (c), subsection (a) of this section applies to all counties with an area of 250 square miles or less, and a population of more then [than] 100,000 according to the most recent decennial federal census, and applies to all cities within such counties.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this section, subsection (a) of this section applies to the housing authorities of all cities that have a population of less than 20,000 according to the most recent decennial federal census and are the location of a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina that has a student enrollment of more than 10,000 students and applies to the housing authorities of all counties that have a population of less than 80,000 according to the most recent decennial federal census and are the location of a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina that has a student enrollment of more than 10,000 students.

History.

1983, c. 769, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1004, s. 1; 2009-218, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-218, s. 1, effective June 30, 2009, added subsection (e).

§ 157-9.2.
Additional powers.

The findings and purposes set forth in the first three paragraphs of

G.S. 122A-2

and in G.S. 122A-5.4(a) are hereby restated and incorporated herein by reference, except that for purposes of incorporating such findings and purposes herein, the phrases “North Carolina Housing Finance Agency” and “Agency” shall read “authority” and the word “Chapter” shall read “Section”.

Words and phrases used in this section and not otherwise defined in this Chapter shall be defined as provided in Chapter 122A of the General Statutes, except that for purposes of incorporating such definitions into this section, the phrases “North Carolina Housing Finance Agency” and “Agency” shall read “authority” and the “Chapter” shall read “Section”.

An authority shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this section, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

To make or participate in the making of mortgage loans to sponsors of residential housing; provided, however, that such loans shall be made only upon the determination by the authority that mortgage loans are not otherwise available wholly or in part from public or private lenders upon equivalent terms and conditions;

To make or participate in the making of mortgage loans to persons and families of lower income and persons and families of moderate income for residential housing; provided, however, that such loans shall be made only upon the determination by the authority that mortgage loans are not otherwise available wholly or in part from public or private lenders upon equivalent terms and conditions;

To make loans to mortgage lenders on terms and conditions requiring the proceeds thereof to be used by such mortgage lenders to originate new mortgage loans to (i) sponsors of residential housing for persons and families of lower income and persons and families of moderate income and (ii) persons and families of lower income and persons and families of moderate income for residential housing. The loans to mortgage lenders and the loans to be made by such mortgage lenders shall be made on such applicable terms and conditions as are set forth in rules and regulations of the authority or otherwise established by the authority; provided, however, that loans shall be made by such mortgage lenders only upon the determination by the authority that such financing is not otherwise available, wholly or in part, from public or private lenders upon equivalent terms and conditions;

To collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with making, purchasing and servicing of its loans, notes, bonds, commitments and other evidences of indebtedness; and

To borrow money to carry out and effectuate its corporate purposes and to issue its obligations as evidence of any such borrowing.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 157-17.1

, the approval of the Local Government Commission shall not be necessary for the issuance of bonds or the incurrence of indebtedness pursuant to this section, and the provisions of the Local Government Finance Act shall not be applicable with respect to bonds issued or indebtedness incurred pursuant to this section. Provided further that notwithstanding any other provision of State law or local ordinance, the approval of the governing body of the county or city in which the housing authority is located shall be necessary for the issuance of bonds or the incurrence of indebtedness pursuant to this section.

This section applies only to housing authorities in any county with an area of 250 square miles or less and a population of more than 100,000 according to the most recent decennial federal census, and applies to all housing authorities of all cities within such counties.

Not later than 30 days prior to making its determination, pursuant to subsections (c)(1), (2) or (3) of this section, that mortgage loans are not otherwise available wholly or in part from public or private lenders upon equivalent terms and conditions, an authority shall give written notice of a proposed financing, including the proposed terms and conditions of the mortgage loans to be made, to the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency. Within 20 days following receipt of such notice, the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency shall respond, in writing, to the authority, and provide the authority with any terms and conditions of mortgage loans which the Agency can make available and which the Agency believes are reasonably relevant to said determination.

History.

1987, c. 423, s. 1.

§ 157-9.3.
Mixed income projects owned or operated by authorities.

If an authority is the owner or operator of a housing project that includes units for persons of other than low or moderate income, the operating expenses of that project (or of all such projects, together, owned or operated by the authority) shall be met entirely from rents from the project (or projects) together with any rent subsidies provided to low income tenants in the project (or projects). No rent subsidy may be provided to any tenant who is not a person of low income, and no rent subsidy may be paid from bond proceeds.

History.

1987, c. 464, s. 4.

§ 157-9.4.
Multi-family rental housing projects.

If an authority owns, operates, or provides financial assistance to a multi-family rental housing project, at least twenty percent (20%) of the units in the project shall be set aside for the exclusive use of persons of low income. An authority may group projects being developed concurrently in order to meet the requirement of this subsection.

If an authority provides financial assistance to a multi-family rental housing project, the authority shall establish, as a condition of the assistance, requirements and procedures that insure that all units initially set aside for the exclusive use of persons of low income continue to be so used for at least 15 years after the initial date on which at least fifty percent (50%) of the units in the project are occupied.

History.

1987, c. 464, s. 4.1.

§ 157-10.
Cooperation of authorities.

Any two or more authorities may join or cooperate with one another in the exercise, either jointly or otherwise, of any or all of their powers for the purpose of financing (including the issuance of bonds, notes or other obligations and giving security therefor), planning, undertaking, owning, constructing, operating or contracting with respect to a housing project or projects located within the boundaries of any one or more of said authorities. For such purpose an authority may by resolution prescribe and authorize any other housing authority or authorities, so joining or cooperating with it, to act on behalf with respect to any or all of such powers. Any authorities joining or cooperating with one another may by resolutions appoint from among the commissioners of such authorities an executive committee with full power to act on behalf of such authorities with respect to any or all of their powers, as prescribed by resolutions of such authorities.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 10; 1943, c. 636, s. 2.

§ 157-11.
Eminent domain.

The authority shall have the right to acquire by eminent domain any real property, including fixtures and improvements, which it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this Article after the adoption by it of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the property described therein is in the public interest and necessary for public use. The authority may exercise the power of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 40A.

Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired, provided, that no property belonging to any city or municipality or to any government may be acquired without its consent and that no property belonging to a public utility corporation may be acquired without the approval of the commission or other officer or tribunal, if any there be, having regulatory power over such corporation.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 11; 1981, c. 919, s. 25.

Cross References.

As to exercise of eminent domain for housing projects generally, see

G.S. 157-48

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For article urging revision and recodification of North Carolina’s eminent domain laws, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 587 (1967).

§ 157-12.
Acquisition of land for government.

The authority may acquire by purchase or by the exercise of its power of eminent domain, as aforesaid, any property real or personal for any housing project being constructed or operated by a government. The authority upon such terms and conditions, with or without consideration, as it shall determine, may convey title or deliver possession of such property so acquired or purchased to such government for use in connection with such housing project.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 12.

§ 157-13.
Zoning and building laws.

All housing projects of an authority shall be subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary and building laws, ordinances and regulations applicable to the locality in which the housing project is situated.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 13.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Zoning for Direct Social Control,” see 1982 Duke L.J. 761 (1982).

§ 157-14.
Types of bonds authority may issue.

An authority shall have power to issue bonds from time to time in its discretion for any of its corporate purposes. An authority shall also have power to issue or exchange refunding bonds for the purpose of paying, retiring, extending or renewing bonds previously issued by it. An authority may issue such types of bonds as it may determine, including (without limiting the generality of the foregoing) bonds on which the principal and interest are payable from income and revenues of the authority and from grants or contributions from the federal government or other source. Such income and revenues securing the bonds may be:

Exclusively the income and revenues of the housing project financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds;

Exclusively the income and revenues of certain designated housing projects, whether or not they are financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds; or

The income and revenues of the authority generally.

Any such bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any income or revenues of the authority, or a mortgage of any housing project, projects or other property of the authority.

Neither the commissioners of an authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof. The bonds and other obligations of an authority (and such bonds and obligations shall so state in their face) shall not be a debt of any city or municipality and neither the State nor any such city or municipality shall be liable thereon, nor in any event shall such bonds or obligations be payable out of any funds or properties other than those of said authority. The bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation of the laws of the State. Bonds may be issued under this Article notwithstanding any debt or other limitation prescribed in any statute.

This Article without reference to other statutes of the State shall constitute full and complete authority for the authorization, issuance, delivery and sale of bonds hereunder and such authorization, issuance, delivery and sale shall not be subject to any conditions, restrictions or limitations imposed by any other law whether general, special or local.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 14; 1939, c. 150, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For symposium on municipal finance, see 1976 Duke L.J. 1051 (1976).

§ 157-15.
Form and sale of bonds.

The bonds of the authority shall be authorized by its resolution and shall be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, not exceeding 60 years from their respective dates, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denominations (which may be made interchangeable), be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption (with or without premium) as such resolution or its trust indenture or mortgage may provide.

The bonds may be sold at public or private sale; provided, however, that no public sale shall be held unless notice thereof is published once at least 10 days prior to such sale in a newspaper having a general circulation in the city in which the authority is located and in a financial newspaper published in the City of New York, New York, or in the City of Chicago, Illinois. The bonds may be sold at such price or prices as the authority shall determine.

Pending the authorization, preparation, execution or delivery of definitive bonds, the authority may issue interim certificates, or other temporary obligations, to the purchaser of such bonds. Such interim certificates, or other temporary obligations, shall be in such form, contain such terms, conditions and provisions, bear such date or dates, and evidence such agreements relating to their discharge or payment or the delivery of definitive bonds as the authority may by resolution, trust indenture or mortgage determine.

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery.

The authority shall have power out of any funds available therefor to purchase any bonds issued by it at a price not more than the principal amount thereof and the accrued interest; provided, however, that bonds payable exclusively from the revenues of a designated project or projects shall be purchased out of any such revenues available therefor. All funds so purchased shall be cancelled. This paragraph shall not apply to the redemption of bonds.

Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds, interim certificates, or other obligations issued pursuant to this Article shall be fully negotiable.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 15; 1971, c. 87, s. 1; 1977, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 157-16.
Provisions of bonds, trust indentures, and mortgages.

In connection with the issuance of bonds and/or the incurring of any obligation under a lease and in order to secure the payment of such bonds and/or obligations, the authority shall have power:

To pledge by resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, or other contract, all or any part of its rents, fees, or revenues.

To covenant against mortgaging all or any part of its property, real or personal, then owned or thereafter acquired, or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon.

To covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any housing project or any part thereof, or with respect to limitations on its right to undertake additional housing projects.

To covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees and revenues to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon.

To provide for the release of property, rents, fees and revenues from any pledge or mortgage, and to reserve rights and powers in, or the right to dispose of, property which is subject to a pledge or mortgage.

To covenant as to the bonds to be issued pursuant to any resolution, trust indenture, mortgage or other instrument and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof.

To covenant as to what other, or additional debt, may be incurred by it.

To provide for the terms, form, registration, exchange, execution and authentication of bonds.

To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds.

To covenant that the authority warrants the title to the premises.

To covenant as to the rents and fees to be charged, the amount (calculated as may be determined) to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees, and other revenues and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof.

To covenant as to the use of any or all of its property, real or personal.

To create or to authorize the creation of special funds in which there shall be segregated

The proceeds of any loan and/or grant;

All of the rents, fees and revenues of any housing project or projects or parts thereof;

Any moneys held for the payment of the costs of operation and maintenance of any such housing projects or as a reserve for the meeting of contingencies in the operation and maintenance thereof;

Any moneys held for the payment of the principal and interest on its bonds or the sums due under its leases and/or as a reserve for such payments; and

Any moneys held for any other reserves or contingencies; and to covenant as to the use and disposal of the moneys held in such funds.

To redeem the bonds, and to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

To covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon, directly or indirectly, by any means or in any manner.

To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given.

To covenant as to the maintenance of its property, the replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon and the use and disposition of insurance moneys.

To vest in an obligee of the authority the right, in the event of the failure of the authority to observe or perform any covenant on its part to be kept or performed, to cure any such default and to advance any moneys necessary for such purpose, and the moneys so advanced may be made an additional obligation of the authority with such interest, security and priority as may be provided in any trust indenture, mortgage, lease or contract of the authority with reference thereto.

To covenant and prescribe as to the events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

To covenant as to the right, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation.

To covenant to surrender possession of all or any part of any housing project or projects upon the happening of an event of default (as defined in the contract) and to vest in an obligee the right without judicial proceedings to take possession and to use, operate, manage and control such housing projects or any part thereof, and to collect and receive all rents, fees and revenues arising therefrom in the same manner as the authority itself might do and to dispose of the moneys collected in accordance with the agreement of the authority with such obligee.

To vest in a trustee or trustees the right to enforce any covenant made to secure, to pay, or in relation to the bonds, to provide for the powers and duties of such trustee or trustees, to limit liabilities thereof and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them may enforce any such covenant.

To make covenants other than in addition to the covenants herein expressly authorized, of like or different character.

To execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers herein granted or in the performance of its covenants or duties, which may contain such covenants and provisions, in addition to those above specified as the government or any purchaser of the bonds of the authority may reasonably require.

To make such covenants and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or in the absolute discretion of the authority tend to make the bonds more marketable; notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein; it being the intention hereof to give the authority power to do all things in the issuance of bonds, in the provisions for their security that are not inconsistent with the Constitution of the State and no consent or approval of any judge or court shall be required thereof.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 16; 1979, c. 690, ss. 2, 3.

§ 157-17.
Power to mortgage when project financed with governmental aid.

In connection with the interim or permanent financing of any project to be permanently financed in whole or in part by a government, or the permanent financing of which is to be secured by a pledge of a government commitment for rental assistance payments, the authority shall also have the power, subject to the consent or approval of any government providing such financing or making such commitment for rental assistance payments, to mortgage all or any part of its property, real or personal, then owned or thereafter acquired, and thereby:

To vest in a government the right, upon the happening of an event of default (as defined in such mortgage), to foreclose such mortgage through judicial proceedings or through the exercise of a power of sale without judicial proceedings, so long as a government shall be the holder of any of the bonds secured by such mortgage.

To vest in a trustee or trustees the right, upon the happening of an event of default (as defined in such mortgage), to foreclose such mortgage through judicial proceedings or through the exercise of a power of sale without judicial proceedings.

To vest in other obligees the right to foreclose such mortgage by judicial proceedings.

To vest in an obligee, including a government, the right in foreclosing any mortgage as aforesaid, to foreclose such mortgage as to all or such part or parts of the property covered thereby as such obligee (in its absolute discretion) shall elect; the institution, prosecution and conclusion of any such foreclosure proceedings and/or the sale of any such parts of the mortgaged property shall not affect in any manner or to any extent the lien of the mortgage on the parts of the mortgaged property not included in such proceedings or not sold as aforesaid.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 17; 1977, c. 784, s. 3.